Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 4. Harassment, Intimidation, and Bullying.

Sec. 14.33.200.
Harassment, intimidation, and bullying policy.

By July 1, 2007, each school district shall adopt a policy that prohibits the harassment, intimidation, or bullying of any student. Each school district shall share this policy with parents or guardians, students, volunteers, and school employees.

The policy must be adopted through the standard policy-making procedure for each district that includes the opportunity for participation by parents or guardians, school employees, volunteers, students, administrators, and community representatives. The policy must emphasize positive character traits and values, including the importance of civil and respectful speech and conduct, and the responsibility of students to comply with the district’s policy prohibiting harassment, intimidation, or bullying. The policy must also include provisions for an appropriate punishment schedule up to and including expulsion and reporting of criminal activity to local law enforcement authorities. School employees, volunteers, students, and administrators shall adhere to this policy.

By January 1, 2007, the department, in consultation with representatives of parents or guardians, school personnel, and other interested parties, may provide to school districts a model harassment, intimidation, and bullying prevention policy and training materials on the components that should be included in a district policy. Training materials may be disseminated in a variety of ways, including workshops and other staff developmental activities, and through the Internet website of the department. Materials included on the Internet website must include the model policy and recommended training and instructional materials. The department may provide a link to the school district’s Internet website for further information.

History.

(§ 1 ch 109 SLA 2006)

Sec. 14.33.210.
Reporting of incidents of harassment, intimidation, or bullying.

Beginning with the 2007 — 2008 school year, each school district shall report to the department by November 30 all incidents resulting in suspension or expulsion for harassment, intimidation, or bullying on school premises or on transportation systems used by schools in the school year preceding the report. The department shall compile the data and report it to the appropriate committees of the Alaska House of Representatives and the Senate.

History.

(§ 1 ch 109 SLA 2006)

Sec. 14.33.220.
Reporting; no reprisals.

A school employee, student, or volunteer may not engage in reprisal, retaliation, or false accusation against a victim, witness, or person with reliable information about an act of harassment, intimidation, or bullying.

A school employee, student, or volunteer who has witnessed, or has reliable information that a student has been subjected to, harassment, intimidation, or bullying, whether verbal or physical, shall report the incident to an appropriate school official.

This section does not prohibit discipline or other adverse action taken in compliance with school district policies against a person who falsely and in bad faith accuses a person of engaging in harassment, intimidation, or bullying or who intentionally provides false information in connection with an investigation of an alleged incident of harassment, intimidation, or bullying.

History.

(§ 1 ch 109 SLA 2006)

Sec. 14.33.230.
Immunity from suit.

A school employee, student, or volunteer who reports an incident of harassment, intimidation, or bullying to a school official and who makes this report in good faith is immune from a cause of action for damages arising from a failure to remedy the reported incident or for making the report.

History.

(§ 1 ch 109 SLA 2006)

Sec. 14.33.250.
Definitions.

In AS

14.33.200

—

14.33.250

,

“district” has the meaning given in AS

14.17.990

;

“harassment, intimidation, or bullying” means an intentional written, oral, or physical act, when the act is undertaken with the intent of threatening, intimidating, harassing, or frightening the student, and

physically harms the student or damages the student’s property;

has the effect of substantially interfering with the student’s education;

is so severe, persistent, or pervasive that it creates an intimidating or threatening educational environment; or

has the effect of substantially disrupting the orderly operation of the school;

“school official” means an employee of a school, including a teacher, administrator, or noncertificated support staff or paraprofessional.

History.

(§ 1 ch 109 SLA 2006)